District of Columbia statutes.
7-751.14

Change of practice site.

(a)

Any change of service obligation site by a Program participant must receive prior authorization from the Director.

(b)

If the employment of a participant is terminated for reasons beyond the participant’s control, such as, for example, the closure of a service obligation site, the participant shall transfer to another approved service obligation site within 6 months of termination. The failure to transfer within 6 months shall be considered a breach of the Program contract.

History

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-71, § 15, 53 DCR 61

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-751.13.